browser/locales/l10n/lv/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lv_LV.aff
SFX f Y 308
SFX f 0   ies       t     is:0xta0
SFX f āt  os     [^j]āt   is:1vta0
SFX f āt  ies    [^j]āt   is:2vta0
SFX f āt  ās     [^j]āt   is:3xta0
SFX f āt  āmies [^jd]āt   is:1dta0
SFX f āt  oties  [^j]āt   is:0xtaa
SFX f āt  ieties [^j]āt   is:2dtap
SFX f āt  as    [eu]dāt   is:3xta0
SFX f āt  as/]| [eu]dāt   is:0xtav
SFX f āt  ās/]|  [^j]āt   is:0xtav
SFX f āt  amies [eu]dāt   is:1dta0
SFX f āt  aties [eu]dāt   is:2dta0
SFX f ēt  os     [^cl]ēt   is:1vta0
SFX f ēt  ies    [^cl]ēt   is:2vta0
SFX f ēt  as     [^cl]ēt   is:3xta0
SFX f ēt  amies  [^cl]ēt   is:1dta0
SFX f ēt  aties  [^cl]ēt   is:2dta0
SFX f ēt  ieties [^cl]ēt   is:2dtap
SFX f ēt  oties  [^cl]ēt   is:0xtaa
SFX f ēt  as/]|  [^cl]ēt   is:0xtav
SFX f lēt  ļos     [u]lēt   is:1vta0
SFX f lēt  lies    [u]lēt   is:2vta0
SFX f lēt  ļas     [u]lēt   is:3xta0
SFX f lēt  ļamies  [u]lēt   is:1dta0
SFX f lēt  ļaties  [u]lēt   is:2dta0
SFX f lēt  lieties [u]lēt   is:2dtap
SFX f lēt  ļoties  [u]lēt   is:0xtaa
SFX f lēt  ļas/]|  [u]lēt   is:0xtav
SFX f ēt  os     [^u]lēt   is:1vta0
SFX f ēt  ies    [^u]lēt   is:2vta0
SFX f ēt  as     [^u]lēt   is:3xta0
SFX f ēt  amies  [^u]lēt   is:1dta0
SFX f ēt  aties  [^u]lēt   is:2dta0
SFX f ēt  ieties [^u]lēt   is:2dtap
SFX f ēt  oties  [^u]lēt   is:0xtaa
SFX f ēt  as/]|  [^u]lēt   is:0xtav
SFX f ēt  os     [^āe]cēt   is:1vta0
SFX f ēt  ies    [^āe]cēt   is:2vta0
SFX f ēt  as     [^āe]cēt   is:3xta0
SFX f ēt  amies  [^āe]cēt   is:1dta0
SFX f ēt  aties  [^āe]cēt   is:2dta0
SFX f ēt  ieties [^āe]cēt   is:2dtap
SFX f ēt  oties  [^āe]cēt   is:0xtaa
SFX f ēt  as/]|  [^āe]cēt   is:0xtav
SFX f cēt kos     [ā]cēt   is:1vta0
SFX f cēt kies    [ā]cēt   is:2vta0
SFX f cēt kas     [ā]cēt   is:3xta0
SFX f cēt kamies  [ā]cēt   is:1dta0
SFX f cēt katies  [ā]cēt   is:2dta0
SFX f cēt kieties [ā]cēt   is:2dtap
SFX f cēt koties  [ā]cēt   is:0xtaa
SFX f cēt kas/]|  [ā]cēt   is:0xtav
SFX f ēt  os     [^t]ecēt   is:1vta0
SFX f ēt  ies    [^t]ecēt   is:2vta0
SFX f ēt  as     [^t]ecēt   is:3xta0
SFX f ēt  amies  [^t]ecēt   is:1dta0
SFX f ēt  aties  [^t]ecēt   is:2dta0
SFX f ēt  ieties [^t]ecēt   is:2dtap
SFX f ēt  oties  [^t]ecēt   is:0xtaa
SFX f ēt  as/]|  [^t]ecēt   is:0xtav
SFX f cēt kos     [t]ecēt  is:1vta0
SFX f ēt  ies     [t]ecēt  is:2vta0
SFX f cēt kas     [t]ecēt  is:3xta0
SFX f cēt kamies  [t]ecēt  is:1dta0
SFX f cēt katies  [t]ecēt  is:2dta0
SFX f cēt kieties [t]ecēt  is:2dtap
SFX f cēt koties  [t]ecēt  is:0xtaa
SFX f cēt kas/]|  [t]ecēt  is:0xtav
SFX f īt  os     [^cz]īt   is:1vta0
SFX f īt  ies    [^cz]īt   is:2vta0
SFX f īt  ās     [^cz]īt   is:3xta0
SFX f īt  āmies  [^cz]īt   is:1dta0
SFX f īt  āties  [^cz]īt   is:2dta0
SFX f īt  ieties [^cz]īt   is:2dtap
SFX f īt  oties  [^cz]īt   is:0xtaa
SFX f īt  ās/]|  [^cz]īt   is:0xtav
SFX f cīt kos     [^āīr]cīt   is:1vta0
SFX f cīt kies    [^āīr]cīt   is:2vta0
SFX f cīt kās     [^āīr]cīt   is:3xta0
SFX f cīt kāmies  [^āīr]cīt   is:1dta0
SFX f cīt kāties  [^āīr]cīt   is:2dta0
SFX f cīt kieties [^āīr]cīt   is:2dtap
SFX f cīt koties  [^āīr]cīt   is:0xtaa
SFX f cīt kās/]|  [^āīr]cīt   is:0xtav
SFX f īt  os     [āīr]cīt   is:1vta0
SFX f īt  ies    [āīr]cīt   is:2vta0
SFX f īt  ās     [āīr]cīt   is:3xta0
SFX f īt  āmies  [āīr]cīt   is:1dta0
SFX f īt  āties  [āīr]cīt   is:2dta0
SFX f īt  ieties [āīr]cīt   is:2dtap
SFX f īt  oties  [āīr]cīt   is:0xtaa
SFX f īt  ās/]|  [āīr]cīt   is:0xtav
SFX f īt  os     [^d]zīt   is:1vta0
SFX f īt  ies    [^d]zīt   is:2vta0
SFX f īt  ās     [^d]zīt   is:3xta0
SFX f īt  āmies  [^d]zīt   is:1dta0
SFX f īt  āties  [^d]zīt   is:2dta0
SFX f īt  ieties [^d]zīt   is:2dtap
SFX f īt  oties  [^d]zīt   is:0xtaa
SFX f īt  ās/]|  [^d]zīt   is:0xtav
SFX f dzīt gos     [d]zīt   is:1vta0
SFX f dzīt gies    [d]zīt   is:2vta0
SFX f dzīt gās     [d]zīt   is:3xta0
SFX f dzīt gāmies  [d]zīt   is:1dta0
SFX f dzīt gāties  [d]zīt   is:2dta0
SFX f dzīt gieties [d]zīt   is:2dtap
SFX f dzīt goties  [d]zīt   is:0xtaa
SFX f dzīt gās/]|  [d]zīt   is:0xtav
SFX f t   stos     [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:1vta0
SFX f t   sties    [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:2vta0
SFX f t   stas     [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:3xta0
SFX f t   stamies  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:1dta0
SFX f t   staties  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:2dta0
SFX f t   stoties  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:0xtaa
SFX f t   stieties [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:2dtap
SFX f t   stas/]|  [^szgkpeāēīo]t   is:0xtav
SFX f 0   os     [z]t   is:1vta0
SFX f 0   ies    [z]t   is:2vta0
SFX f 0   as     [z]t   is:3xta0
SFX f 0   amies  [z]t   is:1dta0
SFX f 0   aties  [z]t   is:2dta0
SFX f 0   oties  [z]t   is:0xtaa
SFX f 0   ieties [z]t   is:2dtap
SFX f 0   as/]|  [z]t   is:0xtav
SFX f 0   os     [^i]rst   is:1vta0
SFX f 0   ies    [^i]rst   is:2vta0
SFX f 0   as     [^i]rst   is:3xta0
SFX f 0   amies  [^i]rst   is:1dta0
SFX f 0   aties  [^i]rst   is:2dta0
SFX f 0   oties  [^i]rst   is:0xtaa
SFX f 0   ieties [^i]rst   is:2dtap
SFX f 0   as/]|  [^i]rst   is:0xtav
SFX f st  dos     [eē]st  is:1vta0
SFX f st  dies    [eē]st  is:0vta0
SFX f st  das     [eē]st  is:3xta0
SFX f st  damies  [eē]st  is:1dta0
SFX f st  daties  [eē]st  is:2dta0
SFX f st  doties  [eē]st  is:0xtaa
SFX f st  dieties [eē]st  is:2dtap
SFX f st  das/]|  [eē]st  is:0xtav
SFX f 0   os     mst   is:1vta0
SFX f 0   ies    mst   is:2vta0
SFX f 0   as     mst   is:3xta0
SFX f 0   amies  mst   is:1dta0
SFX f 0   aties  mst   is:2dta0
SFX f 0   oties  mst   is:0xtaa
SFX f 0   ieties mst   is:2dtap
SFX f 0   as/]|  mst   is:0xtav
SFX f irst ērtos     [c]irst   is:1vta0
SFX f irst ērties    [c]irst   is:2vta0
SFX f irst ērtas     [c]irst   is:3xta0
SFX f irst ērtamies  [c]irst   is:1dta0
SFX f irst ērtaties  [c]irst   is:2dta0
SFX f irst ērtoties  [c]irst   is:0xtaa
SFX f irst ērtieties [c]irst   is:2dtap
SFX f irst ērtas/]|  [c]irst   is:0xtav
SFX f 0   os     [mv]irst  is:1vta0
SFX f 0   ies    [mv]irst  is:2vta0
SFX f 0   as     [mv]irst  is:3xta0
SFX f 0   amies  [mv]irst  is:1dta0
SFX f 0   aties  [mv]irst  is:2dta0
SFX f 0   oties  [mv]irst  is:0xtaa
SFX f 0   ieties [mv]irst  is:2dtap
SFX f 0   as/]|  [mv]irst  is:0xtav
SFX f  0   os     [^z]ist   is:1vta0
SFX f  0   ies    [^z]ist   is:2vta0
SFX f  0   as     [^z]ist   is:3xta0
SFX f  0   amies  [^z]ist   is:1dta0
SFX f  0   aties  [^z]ist   is:2dta0
SFX f  0   oties  [^z]ist   is:0xtaa
SFX f  0   ieties [^z]ist   is:2dtap
SFX f  0   as/]|  [^z]ist   is:0xtav
SFX f  st  estos     [z]ist   is:1vta0
SFX f  st  esties    [z]ist   is:2vta0
SFX f  st  estas     [z]ist   is:3xta0
SFX f  st  estamies  [z]ist   is:1dta0
SFX f  st  estaties  [z]ist   is:2dta0
SFX f  st  estoties  [z]ist   is:0xtaa
SFX f  st  estieties [z]ist   is:2dtap
SFX f  st  estas/]|  [z]ist   is:0xtav
SFX f  gt  egos      igt   is:1vta0
SFX f  gt  edzies    igt   is:2vta0
SFX f  gt  egas      igt   is:3xta0
SFX f  gt  egamies   igt   is:1dta0
SFX f  gt  egaties   igt   is:2dta0
SFX f  gt  edzieties igt   is:2dtap
SFX f  gt  egoties   igt   is:0xtaa
SFX f  gt  egas/]|   igt   is:0xtav
SFX f  agt ogos      agt  is:1vta0
SFX f  agt odzies    agt  is:2vta0
SFX f  agt ogas      agt  is:3xta0
SFX f  agt ogamies   agt  is:1dta0
SFX f  agt ogaties   agt  is:2dta0
SFX f  agt odzieties agt  is:2dtap
SFX f  agt ogoties   agt  is:0xtaa
SFX f  agt ogas/]|   agt  is:0xtav
SFX f  t   stos     [^aioulr]kt   is:1vta0
SFX f  t   sties    [^aioulr]kt   is:2vta0
SFX f  t   stas     [^aioulr]kt   is:3xta0
SFX f  t   stamies  [^aioulr]kt   is:1dta0
SFX f  t   staties  [^aioulr]kt   is:2dta0
SFX f  t   stoties  [^aioulr]kt   is:0xtaa
SFX f  t   stieties [^aioulr]kt   is:2dtap
SFX f  t   stas/]|  [^aioulr]kt   is:0xtav
SFX f  akt  okos     akt   is:1vta0
SFX f  akt  ocies    akt   is:2vta0
SFX f  akt  okas     akt   is:3xta0
SFX f  akt  okamies  akt   is:1dta0
SFX f  akt  okaties  akt   is:2dta0
SFX f  akt  ocieties akt   is:2dtap
SFX f  akt  okoties  akt   is:0xtaa
SFX f  akt  okas/]|  akt   is:0xtav
SFX f  kt  ekos     ikt   is:1vta0
SFX f  kt  ecies    ikt   is:2vta0
SFX f  kt  ekas     ikt   is:3xta0
SFX f  kt  ekamies  ikt   is:1dta0
SFX f  kt  ekaties  ikt   is:2dta0
